src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON LOGIF   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 logi:        LOGI             ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Sg+Com+Attr:lot     K                ;
 logi+Num+Ess+Attr:lot     K                ;
   logi+Num+Cmp/SgGen:lot     NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
   logi+Num+Cmp/SgGen:loh     NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          logát+A+Ord:logád   VUOSTTAS         ;
                logis:lohºkis OVCCIS_N         ;
                 logi:loge    NARE             ;
                 logi:logi    NARE             ;


LEXICON NUPPELOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                  goalmmátlohkái:%>goalmmát               BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                  njealjátlohkái:%>njealját               BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                     viđátlohkái:%>viđát                  BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                     guđátlohkái:%>guđát                  BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                   čihččetlohkái:%>čihččet                BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                   gávccátlohkái:%>gávccát                BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                    ovccátlohkái:%>ovccát                 BARE-LOHKAI      ;
                     logátlohkái:%>logát                  BARE-LOHKAI      ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Nom:%>nuppe#lohká%>j         K                ;
             nuppelohkái+Num+Ess:%>nubbin#lohki%>n        K                ;
      nuppelohkái+Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>nubbin#logi%>n         K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Acc:%>nuppe#lohká%>j         K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Gen:%>nuppe#logi             K                ;
       nuppelohkái+Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>nuppe#logi             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
       nuppelohkái+Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>nuppe#lot              NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
       nuppelohkái+Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>nuppe#loh              NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! golmmagielat
            nuppelohkái+Num+Attr:%>nuppe#lot              K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:%>nuppe#logi%>s          K                ;
 nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>nuppe#logi%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Nom:%>nuppit#logi%>t         K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:%>nuppe#lohká%>j         K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Sg+Com:%>nuppijn#logi%>jn       K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Acc:%>nuppijd#logi%>X5jd     K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Gen:%>nuppijd#logi%>X5jd     K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Ill:%>nuppijd#logi%>jde      K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Ill:%>nuppijde#logi%>jde     K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Loc:%>nuppijn#logi%>jn       K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Com:%>nuppijd#logi%>jgujn    K                ;
          nuppelohkái+Num+Pl+Com:%>nuppijguin#logi%>jgujn K                ;



LEXICON GOLBMALOGIOKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          okta+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#okta              K                ;
             okta+Num+Ess:#logi#okta%>n           K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#okta              K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
       okta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovtta             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovtta%>s          K                ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovtta%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          okta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okti%>j           K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovtta%>t          K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovtta%>ide        K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovtta%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIOKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          okta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#okta          K                ;
             okta+Num+Ess:#logi#okta%>n           K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#okta              K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
       okta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#ovtta             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#ovtta%>s          K                ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#ovtta%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          okta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#okti%>j           K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#ovtta             K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#ovtta%>t          K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#ovtta%>ide        K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#ovtta%>jguin      K                ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIOKTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   okta+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e#logi#akta              K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#okta              K                ;
             okta+Num+Ess:e#logi#okta%>n           K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#okta              K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#ovtta             K                ;
       okta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#ovtta             NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#ovtta%>s          K                ;
 okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#ovtta%>n          K                ; ! !SOUTH
          okta+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#okti%>j           K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#ovtta             K                ;
     okta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#ovtta             K                ;
          okta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#ovtta%>t          K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#ovtta%>ide        K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
     okta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#okºta%>X5jd       K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#ovtta%>jn K                ;
          okta+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#ovtta%>jguin      K                ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
   guoktelogi:guokºt         GUOKTELOGIOKTA     ;
   golbmalogi:golbma         GOLBMALOGIOKTA     ;
 njealljelogi:njeallj        GUOKTELOGIOKTA     ;
    čiežalogi:čieža          GOLBMALOGIOKTA     ;
    giežalogi:gieža          GOLBMALOGIOKTA     ;
   gávccilogi:gávcci         GAVCCILOGIOKTA     ;
    gákcilogi:gákci          GAVCCILOGIOKTA     ;
    ovccilogi:ovcci          GAVCCILOGIOKTA     ;
LEXICON CUODI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                        čuođi:čuođi#                LOGIF            ;
                   oktačuohti:okta#čuohti#          LOGIF            ;
                       čuohti:čuohti#               LOGIF            ;
